Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-2061
Public hospital;
indebtedness, how construed; expenditures, limitation; membership interests and contractual joint ventures; how
construed.

(1) All agreements and
obligations undertaken and all securities issued, as permitted under sections
71-2056 to 71-2061, by a hospital which is owned or operated by a political
subdivision, state agency, or other governmental entity shall be exclusively
an obligation of the hospital and shall not create an obligation or debt of
the state or any political subdivision, state agency, or other governmental
entity. The full faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision,
state agency, or other governmental entity shall not be pledged for the payment
of any securities issued by such a hospital, nor shall the state or any political
subdivision, state agency, or other governmental entity be liable in any manner
for the payment of the principal of or interest on any securities of such
a hospital or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation, or
agreement of any kind that may be undertaken by such a hospital.

(2) Expenditures permitted by sections 71-2056 to 71-2061
to be made by or on behalf of a hospital shall be for operating and maintaining
public hospitals and public facilities for a public purpose. No such expenditure
shall be considered to be a giving or lending of the credit of the state,
or a granting of public money or a thing of value, in aid of any individual,
association, or corporation within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory
provision.

(3) Membership
interests and contractual joint ventures permitted by section 71-2059 that
further the purposes of the political subdivision, state agency, or other
governmental entity shall not be considered to cause the political subdivision,
state agency, or other governmental entity to become a subscriber or owner
of capital stock or any interest in a private corporation or association within
the meaning of Nebraska law.

Laws 1985, LB 61, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 15.